Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF621.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1983YH (7) 91 sb/js H.F. 621 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 285.17 Weapons in school vehicles 1 transporting pupils. 2 When transportation is provided pursuant to this chapter, 3 a driver shall not permit firearms or other weapons, nor 4 ammunition, to be carried in the passenger compartment of any 5 school vehicle transporting pupils except when the school 6 district or nonpublic school authorizes or directs a person 7 to carry, transport, or possess a firearm, other weapon, or 8 ammunition in the school vehicle. 9 Sec. 2. Section 724.4B, subsection 2, Code 2025, is amended 10 by adding the following new paragraphs: 11 NEW PARAGRAPH . i. A person, whether a driver or passenger 12 and including a person authorized or directed pursuant to 13 section 285.17, while the person is dropping off or picking 14 up from a school a student, staff member, or other person 15 having business at the school, or while the person is making 16 a delivery or pickup at a school, who has in the personâs 17 possession a valid permit to carry weapons issued pursuant 18 to section 724.7, while going armed with, carrying, or 19 transporting a concealed pistol or revolver if the concealed 20 pistol or revolver remains in the vehicle and the vehicle 21 remains on the portion of the grounds of the school that 22 comprises its driveways and parking areas. The vehicle shall 23 be locked when unattended. 24 NEW PARAGRAPH . j. A person retired under chapter 97A 25 or 411, or section 97B.49B or 97B.49C, after service as a 26 peace officer who retired in good standing, who maintains 27 certification, and who, during the most recent twelve-month 28 period, has met the standards for qualifications in firearm 29 safety training determined by the state agency or political 30 subdivision that the person formerly served. 31 Sec. 3. EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act, being deemed of immediate 32 importance, takes effect upon enactment. 33